New Jersey, session 222, S2423.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding any other provision of the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., a veteran shall not be subject to tax under the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., if the veteran meets the qualifications of subsection b. of this section. b.  To qualify for the exemption from tax provided by this section, a veteran shall: (1) be honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States, a reserve component thereof, or the National Guard of New Jersey in a federal active duty status; and (2) have gross income of $50,000 or less, regardless of the veterans filing status. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 next following the date of enactment.